Washington statutes.
RCW 35.104.080

Limitation on bonds issued.

The bonds issued by a local government under RCW 35.104.070 shall not constitute an obligation of the state of Washington, either general or special.

[ 2007 c 251 s 8.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—Severability—2007 c 251: See notes following RCW 35.104.010.